Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,276
Diversion of utility services; civil actions; recovery authorized.

(1) A utility may bring a civil action for damages against any person who commits, authorizes, solicits, aids, abets, or attempts (a) bypassing, (b) tampering, or (c) unauthorized metering when such act results in damages to the utility. A utility may bring a civil action for damages pursuant to this section against any person receiving the benefit of utility service through means of bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering.

(2) In any civil action brought pursuant to this section, the utility shall be entitled, upon proof of willful or intentional bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering, to recover as damages:

(a) The amount of actual damage or loss if the amount of the damage or loss is susceptible of reasonable calculation; or

(b) Liquidated damages of seven hundred fifty dollars if the amount of actual damage or loss is not susceptible of reasonable calculation.

In addition to damage or loss under subdivision (a) or (b) of this subsection, the utility may recover all reasonable expenses and costs incurred on account of the bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering, including, but not limited to, disconnection, reconnection, service calls, equipment, costs of the suit, and reasonable attorneys' fees in cases within the scope of section 25-1801.

Laws 1983, LB 350, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-331.02;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 422.